Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 14. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 34.35.900.
Acknowledgment of satisfaction.

When a lien is satisfied by payment, an acknowledgment of satisfaction suitable for recordation shall be delivered to all parties to the lien by the lien claimant. The acknowledgment of satisfaction shall be delivered immediately upon payment by tender of cash in satisfaction of the claim or within 10 days after payment when satisfaction is obtained in some other manner. A certificate of discharge of a lien for nonpayment of a state tax or license fee recorded under AS

43.10.042

shall be delivered within 15 days after tender of cash in satisfaction of the claim or within 30 days when satisfaction is obtained in some other manner. The acknowledgment must identify all parties to the lien and any property subject to the lien using the same name or description contained in the claim of record, if a claim was made, and the book and page of the official record containing the claim or the serial number assigned to the claim by the recorder.

A lien claimant or assignee who, after payment in full of the lien claim and after written demand by a person liable upon the lien, fails without just cause for a period of 30 days to execute and file or record an acknowledgment of satisfaction in the recording district in which the claim of lien is filed or recorded is liable to the person making the demand or the grantees or heirs of that person for all damages that they may sustain by reason of that failure and shall also forfeit to them the sum of $100.

History.

(§ 26-9-10 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 9 SLA 1978; am § 44 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

34.35.485

.
Renumbered in 1985.

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsection (b) of this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Cross references. —

For satisfaction of judgments, see AS

09.30.300

and

09.30.310

.

Sec. 34.35.910.
Employment considered continuous.

The fact that a lien claimant is employed at different kinds of labor or at different rates of wages during the period of general employment is not considered an interruption of the continuity of employment.

A temporary cessation of employment of the lien claimant under an understanding of resumption of employment within a reasonable time is not considered an interruption of the continuity of employment so as to cause the time to run within which the notice of the lien is required to be filed for record.

History.

(§ 26-9-1 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 34.35.490.
Renumbered in 1985.

Sec. 34.35.920.
Waiver of lien.

Except as provided under AS

34.35.117

and

34.35.119

, an agreement by a person mentioned in AS

34.35.010

—

34.35.425

to waive the right to acquire a lien provided in AS

34.35.010

—

34.35.425

is invalid.

History.

(§ 26-9-12 ACLA 1949; am § 17 ch 175 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 34.35.495.
Renumbered in 1985.

Sec. 34.35.930.
Liberal construction of chapter.

The intent of this chapter is remedial and its provisions shall be liberally construed.

History.

(§ 26-9-13 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 34.35.500.
Renumbered in 1985.

Sec. 34.35.950.
Nonconsensual common law liens.

A nonconsensual common law lien is invalid unless the lien is authorized by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction recognized under state or federal law.

A person may not submit a nonconsensual common law lien under AS 40.17 to the recorder in order to record the lien unless the lien is accompanied by a specific order authorizing the recording of the lien issued by a court of competent jurisdiction recognized under state or federal law. When a nonconsensual common law lien is submitted for recording under this subsection, the court order accompanying the lien shall be recorded with the lien.

A person may not submit a nonconsensual common law lien under a law authorizing the filing of a lien against personal property in order to file the lien unless the lien is accompanied by a specific order authorizing the filing of the lien issued by a court of competent jurisdiction recognized under state or federal law. When a nonconsensual common law lien is submitted for filing under this subsection, the court order accompanying the lien shall be filed with the lien.

In this section,

“filed” means the acceptance of a document by a department or person having responsibility for the receipt and filing of documents that may be filed and that are presented for filing in the place of filing designated by law, whether or not under applicable law the department or person is directed to file the document;

“nonconsensual common law lien” means a lien on real or personal property that

is not provided for by a specific state or federal statute or municipal ordinance;

does not depend on the consent of the owner of the property affected for its existence; and

is not an equitable, constructive, or other lien imposed by a court recognized under state or federal law;

“record” means the acceptance of a document by the recorder that the recorder has determined is recordable under AS 40.17 and that is presented for recording in the place of recording designated for the recording district where affected property is located whether or not the place of recording is in that district and whether or not under applicable law the recorder is directed to record the document;

“recorder” means the commissioner of natural resources or the person designated by the commissioner of natural resources to perform the duties set out in AS 40.17.

History.

(§ 5 ch 20 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 9 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective June 13, 2017, in (d)(2)(A), added “or municipal ordinance” at the end.

Opinions of attorney general. —

“Common law liens at law” and “claims of common law” which are filed in connection with lawsuits unrelated to the title or right to possession of real property are not legally effective for any purpose whatsoever. Such documents may not legally be recorded, and the recorder should not record these documents. March 24, 1980, Op. Att’y Gen.